Illinois, session 104th, SB3927.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Energy Transition Act is amended by 5changing Section 5-20 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 730/5-20)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 15, 2045)8    Sec. 5-20. Clean Jobs Workforce Network Program. 9    (a) As used in this Section: ,10    "Climate, environmental, and clean energy sector" means 11occupations, training pathways, or career pipelines related 12to: climate adaptation or climate change mitigation; 13environmental conservation and restoration; ecosystem 14resilience; clean or renewable energy; and related 15technologies or services. 16    "Program" means the Clean Jobs Workforce Network Program.17    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall develop 18and, through Regional Administrators, administer the Clean 19Jobs Workforce Network Program to create a network of 14 20Program delivery Hub Sites with program elements delivered by 21community-based organizations and their subcontractors 22geographically distributed across the State including at least 23one Hub Site located in or near each of the following areas:   SB3927- 2 -LRB104 18905 HLH 32350 b1Chicago (South Side), Chicago (Southwest and West Sides), 2Waukegan, Rockford, Aurora, Joliet, Peoria, Champaign, 3Danville, Decatur, Carbondale, East St. Louis, Kankakee, and 4Alton. 5    (c) In admitting program participants, for each workforce 6Hub Site, the Regional Administrators shall: 7        (1) in each Hub Site where the applicant pool allows:8            (A) dedicate at least one-third of program 9        placements to applicants who reside in a geographic 10        area that is impacted by economic and environmental 11        challenges, defined as an area that is both (i) an R3 12        Area, as defined pursuant to Section 10-40 of the 13        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act, and (ii) an 14        environmental justice community, as defined by the 15        Illinois Power Agency, excluding any racial or ethnic 16        indicators used by the agency unless and until the 17        constitutional basis for their inclusion in 18        determining program admissions is established. Among 19        applicants that satisfy these criteria, preference 20        shall be given to applicants who face barriers to 21        employment, such as low educational attainment, prior 22        involvement with the criminal legal system, and 23        language barriers; and applicants that are graduates 24        of or currently enrolled in the foster care system; 25        and26            (B) dedicate at least two-thirds of program   SB3927- 3 -LRB104 18905 HLH 32350 b1        placements to applicants that satisfy the criteria in 2        paragraph (1) or who reside in a geographic area that 3        is impacted by economic or environmental challenges, 4        defined as an area that is either (i) an R3 Area, as 5        defined pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis 6        Regulation and Tax Act, or (ii) an environmental 7        justice community, as defined by the Illinois Power 8        Agency, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators used 9        by the agency unless and until the constitutional 10        basis for their inclusion in determining program 11        admissions is established. Among applicants that 12        satisfy these criteria, preference shall be given to 13        applicants who face barriers to employment, such as 14        low educational attainment, prior involvement with the 15        criminal legal system, and language barriers; and 16        applicants that are graduates of or currently enrolled 17        in the foster care system; and 18        (2) prioritize the remaining program placements for: 19    applicants who are displaced energy workers as defined in 20    the Energy Community Reinvestment Act; persons who face 21    barriers to employment, including low educational 22    attainment, prior involvement with the criminal legal 23    system, and language barriers; and applicants who are 24    graduates of or currently enrolled in the foster care 25    system, regardless of the applicant's area of residence.26    The Department and Regional Administrators shall protect   SB3927- 4 -LRB104 18905 HLH 32350 b1the confidentiality of any personal information provided by 2program applicants regarding the applicant's status as a 3formerly incarcerated person or foster care recipient; 4however, the Department or Regional Administrators may publish 5aggregated data on the number of participants that were 6formerly incarcerated or foster care recipients so long as 7that publication protects the identities of those persons.8    Any person who applies to the program may elect not to 9share with the Department or Regional Administrators whether 10he or she is a graduate or currently enrolled in the foster 11care system or was formerly convicted.12    (d) Program elements for each Hub Site shall be provided 13by a community-based organization. The Department shall 14initially select a community-based organization in each Hub 15Site and shall subsequently select a community-based 16organization in each Hub Site every 3 years. Community-based 17organizations delivering program elements outlined in 18subsection (e) may provide all elements required or may 19subcontract to other entities for provision of portions of 20program elements, including, but not limited to, 21administrative soft and hard skills for program participants, 22delivery of specific training in the core curriculum, or 23provision of other support functions for program delivery 24compliance. 25    (e) The Clean Jobs Workforce Hubs Network shall:26        (1) coordinate with Energy Transition Navigators: (i)   SB3927- 5 -LRB104 18905 HLH 32350 b1    to increase participation in the Clean Jobs Workforce 2    Network Program and clean energy and related sector 3    workforce and training opportunities; (ii) coordinate 4    recruitment, communications, and ongoing engagement with 5    potential employers, including, but not limited to, 6    activities such as job matchmaking initiatives, hosting 7    events such as job fairs, and collaborating with other Hub 8    Sites to identify and implement best practices for 9    employer engagement; and (iii) leverage community-based 10    organizations, educational institutions, and 11    community-based and labor-based training providers to 12    ensure program-eligible individuals across the State have 13    dedicated and sustained support to enter and complete the 14    career pipeline for clean energy and related sector jobs; 15        (1.1) incorporate targeted outreach, recruitment, 16    training, and placement services specifically for 17    participants seeking careers within the climate, 18    environmental, and clean energy sector, including, but not 19    limited to, roles in industries such as renewable energy 20    generation, energy efficiency, environmental remediation, 21    sustainability consulting, and ecosystem management; 22        (2) develop formal partnerships, including formal 23    sector partnerships between community-based organizations 24    and entities that provide climate, environmental, clean 25    energy jobs, including businesses, nonprofit 26    organizations, and worker-owned cooperatives, to ensure   SB3927- 6 -LRB104 18905 HLH 32350 b1    that Program participants have priority access to 2    employment training and hiring opportunities; and3        (3) implement the Clean Jobs Curriculum that prepares 4    participants for climate, environmental, and clean energy 5    sector careers to provide, including, but not limited to, 6    training, certification preparation, job readiness, and 7    skill development, including soft skills, math skills, 8    technical skills, certification test preparation, and 9    other development needed, to Program participants. 10    (f) Funding for the Program is subject to appropriation 11from the Energy Transition Assistance Fund. 12    (g) The Department shall require submission of quarterly 13reports, including program performance metrics by each Hub 14Site to the Regional Administrator of their Program Delivery 15Area. Program performance metrics include, but are not limited 16to:17        (1) demographic data, including racial, gender, 18    residency in eligible communities, and geographic 19    distribution data, on Program trainees entering and 20    graduating the Program;21        (2) demographic data, including racial, gender, 22    residency in eligible communities, and geographic 23    distribution data, on Program trainees who are placed in 24    employment, including the percentages of trainees by race, 25    gender, and geographic categories in each individual job 26    type or category and whether employment is union,   SB3927- 7 -LRB104 18905 HLH 32350 b1    nonunion, or nonunion via temporary agency; 2        (3) trainee job acquisition and retention statistics, 3    including the duration of employment (start and end dates 4    of hires) by race, gender, and geography; 5        (4) hourly wages, including hourly overtime pay rate, 6    and benefits of trainees placed into employment by race, 7    gender, and geography; 8        (5) percentage of jobs by race, gender, and geography 9    held by Program trainees or graduates that are full-time 10    equivalent positions, meaning that the position held is 11    full-time, direct, and permanent based on 2,080 hours 12    worked per year (paid directly by the employer, whose 13    activities, schedule, and manner of work the employer 14    controls, and receives pay and benefits in the same manner 15    as permanent employees); and 16        (6) qualitative data consisting of open-ended 17    reporting on pertinent issues, including, but not limited 18    to, qualitative descriptions accompanying metrics or 19    identifying key successes and challenges.20    (g-5) In addition to the reporting requirements under 21subsection (g), the Department shall collect, track, and 22report the following, disaggregated by race, gender, 23geography, and equity status: 24        (1) the number and percentage of program participants 25    who are enrolled in training or placed in employment 26    specifically within the climate, environmental, and clean   SB3927- 8 -LRB104 18905 HLH 32350 b1    energy sector; 2        (2) the average wage, retention rate at 6 and 12 3    months, and benefits, including union status, for 4    participants in those sectors; 5        (3) the number and type of sector-specific 6    certifications achieved by program participants, 7    including, but not limited to, ecosystem restoration and 8    conservation credentials, and other Department-recognized 9    credentials relevant to the climate, environmental, and 10    clean energy sector; and 11        (4) qualitative feedback from participants employed in 12    the climate, environmental, or clean energy sector 13    regarding career progression, job satisfaction, and 14    further training needs. 15    (h) Within 3 years after the effective date of this Act, 16the Department shall select an independent evaluator to review 17and prepare a report on the performance of the Program and 18Regional Administrators.19(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 103-595, eff. 7-1-25.)